North Carolina, session 2025, SB926.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Winston-Salem Urban
League to support economic empowerment, education, and workforce initiatives.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S926-v-1*